Hawaii statutes.
[§143-20] Reporting of dog or cat captured
or killed in snare or trap. Any dog or cat captured or killed in any
steel-jawed leg-hold trap, snare, conibear trap, or foot- or leg-hold trap, as
those terms are defined in section 711-1109.37, in an area zoned as residential
shall immediately be checked for identification and reported to a county animal
control officer and, upon request, shall be turned over to the animal control
officer. [L 2013, c 208, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next